Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6602
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that Nebraska is home to an emerging biotechnology and bioproducts sector that yields important innovations and collaborative opportunities with the existing agricultural sector. The Legislature further finds that advances in biotechnology and bioproducts will play a critical role in addressing global challenges, reducing our environmental footprint, and creating sustainable materials including renewable chemicals made from Nebraska-based agricultural products.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 68.